Hawaii statutes.
§501-73 Removing clouds on title. The
court may remove clouds on titles and may find and decree in whom the title or
any interest, legal or equitable, in land is vested, whether in the applicant
or in any other person. [L 1909, c 11, §5; RL 1925, pt of §3228; RL 1935, pt of
§5037; RL 1945, pt of §12637; RL 1955, pt of §342-38; HRS §501-73]

Case Notes

Dower, power of widow to convey. 21 H. 431.

Court may decree title to be in beneficiary of trust when
trustee's sole duty was to convey. 26 H. 809, 816.

Applicant has burden of establishing its title. 50 H. 507,
444 P.2d 909.

Cited: 20 H. 355, 357; 37 H. 74, 95, aff'd 158 F.2d 122.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next